Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Fossil Fuel and Hydrocarbon Research

152.310.
Definitions. [Renumbered.]

152.320.
Establishment of research program. [Renumbered.]

152.330.
Duties of secretary. [Renumbered.]

152.340.
Powers of secretary. [Renumbered.]

152.350.
Office and employees. [Renumbered.]

152.360.
Study grants. [Renumbered.]

152.370.
Advisory committee. [Repealed.]

152.380.
Interstate agreements. [Renumbered.]

152.390.
Extension of program into state schools. [Renumbered.]